Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.030

Geologist licensing board.

The state geologist licensing board is created. The board consists of seven members, six of whom shall be appointed by the director, who shall advise the director concerning the administration of this chapter. Of the initial appointments to the board, five shall be actively engaged in the practice of geology for at least ten years, five of which shall have been immediately prior to their appointment to the board. Subsequent to the initial appointments, five members of the board must be geologists licensed under this chapter, two of whom shall be licensed in a specialty of geology recognized under this chapter. Insofar as possible, the composition of the appointed geologists serving on the board shall be generally representative of the occupational distribution of geologists licensed under this chapter. One member of the board must be a member of the general public with no family or business connection with the practice of geology. The supervisor of geology of the department of natural resources is an ex officio member of the board. Members of the board shall be appointed for terms of four years. Terms shall be staggered so that not more than two appointments are scheduled to be made in any calendar year. Members shall hold office until the expiration of the terms for which they were appointed and until their successors have been appointed and have qualified. A board member may be removed for just cause. The director may appoint a new member to fill a vacancy on the board for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Each board member shall be entitled to compensation for each day spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

[ 2000 c 253 s 4.]